Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202081-5,204
Operator; requirements.

No person shall operate an amusement ride unless he or she is at least sixteen years of age. An operator shall be in attendance at all times that an amusement ride is in operation.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1815;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 40.